test/src/morphology/N-port_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pȯrt: # Noun 95 'eng /est hoor/fin' - full paradigm
     pȯrt+N+Sg+Nom: pȯrt
     pȯrt+N+Sg+Gen: pȯrt
     pȯrt+N+Sg+Par: pȯrtõ
     pȯrt+N+Sg+Dat: pȯrtõn
     pȯrt+N+Sg+Ins: pȯrtõks
     pȯrt+N+Sg+Ill: pȯrtõ
     pȯrt+N+Sg+Ela: pȯrtstõ
     pȯrt+N+Pl+Nom: pūortõd
     pȯrt+N+Pl+Gen: pūortõd
     pȯrt+N+Pl+Par: pūortidi
     pȯrt+N+Pl+Dat: pūortõdõn
     pȯrt+N+Pl+Ins: pūortõdõks
     pȯrt+N+Pl+Ill: pūortiž
     pȯrt+N+Pl+Ela: pūortist
